Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2938
USDA/APHIS/VS, defined.

USDA/APHIS/VS means the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, Veterinary Services.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 38.